Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 2
ACQUISITION OF CONTROL OF BANKS
AND BANK HOLDING COMPANIES

Law reviews:

For article, "Interstate Banking

C

omes to

C

olorado", see 17 Colo. Law. 1089 (1988).

11-104-201. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds, determines, and declares that, in authorizing expansion of interstate banking to this state, primary consideration should be given to providing positive benefits for the people of this state; to affording protection to bank depositors in this state; to enhancing the opportunity of the people of this state to receive services provided by banks and bank holding companies; and to setting forth the standards under which out-of-state bank holding companies may acquire or control Colorado banks and bank holding companies.

In order to comply with the considerations set forth in subsection (1) of this section with respect to interstate branch banking, the general assembly finds and declares that de novo interstate branching into or out of this state is expressly authorized on or after July 1, 2013, and that interstate branching through the acquisition of one or more branches of an insured financial institution in this state or another state is expressly authorized on or after July 1, 2013.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1109, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(2) amended, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1465, § 10, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-6.4-101 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-104-202. Acquisition of control of bank holding companies and banks by bank holding companies in different states - interstate banking and branching - rules.

A Colorado bank holding company may acquire control of out-of-state bank holding companies and out-of-state banks; and, subject to the limitations of subsections (2) to (6) of this section, an out-of-state bank holding company may acquire control of Colorado financial institutions.

An out-of-state bank holding company may, after July 1, 2013, acquire control of, merge with, or acquire all or substantially all of the assets of, a Colorado depository institution having its principal place of business in Colorado. An out-of-state bank holding company acquiring control of a Colorado bank holding company or thrift holding company may, after July 1, 2013, acquire control of or merge with any Colorado depository institution controlled by the Colorado bank holding company or thrift holding company.

A bank holding company may acquire control of any Colorado bank by organizing or seeking to charter a de novo Colorado bank.

A bank holding company may not acquire control of any financial institution if such acquisition of control will result, at the time of such acquisition, in the bank holding company controlling more than twenty-five percent of the aggregate of all deposits in all banks, savings and loan associations, federal savings banks, and other financial institutions located in Colorado, which are federally insured. For the purpose of this subsection (4), deposits shall be determined based upon the public reports most recently filed with the appropriate federal regulatory agency.

A bank holding company may not acquire control of a Colorado financial institution unless, immediately before such acquisition, such bank holding company has such capital as the banking board may require by rule.

Interstate branching through the acquisition of a branch of an insured financial institution without the acquisition of such financial institution is expressly authorized. De novo interstate branching is expressly authorized. Deposit production offices are expressly prohibited.

No bank holding company may acquire control of any financial institution that controls a Colorado financial institution except in accordance with the provisions of this section and with prior approval of the federal reserve board under section 3(a) of the federal "Bank Holding Company Act", 12 U.S.C. sec. 1842 (a).

A bank or bank holding company that intends to acquire control of any Colorado financial institution or to conduct interstate branching in Colorado shall provide the banking board with the name or names under which it proposes to conduct the business of such bank, bank holding company, or branch. The bank or bank holding company shall not be eligible to conduct interstate branching or make any such acquisition if the proposed name is either:

Identical to or deceptively similar to the name of any existing Colorado financial institution; except that this paragraph (a) shall not apply if the bank or bank holding company obtains express written consent of the affected existing Colorado financial institution; or

Likely to cause the public to be confused, deceived, or mistaken.

Concurrently with the filing of its application or notice with the appropriate federal or state regulatory agency concerning the acquisition, merger, or control of a Colorado financial institution, or concerning an interstate branch, a bank or bank holding company shall file a copy of the application or notice with the banking board, which may submit advisory comments to the appropriate federal or state regulatory agency.

A bank or bank holding company shall not conduct interstate branching in Colorado, merge with, or acquire control, directly or indirectly, of any Colorado financial institution without first obtaining a certificate from the banking board certifying that such branch, merger, or acquisition complies with this article and the "Public Deposit Protection Act", article 10.5 of this title.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1110, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(2), (3), (6), (9), and (10) amended, (SB13-154), ch. 282, pp. 1465, 1484, §§ 11, 53, effective July 1.

11-104-203. Authority of banking board to enforce provisions of article.

Any bank holding company controlling any other bank holding company or bank pursuant to this code in this state is, for purposes of enforcing this article, subject to the jurisdiction of the banking board with respect to its operations and affairs in the state of Colorado. The banking board may utilize the applicable powers conferred by this code and the "Public Deposit Protection Act", article 10.5 of this title, to carry out the duties imposed by this section.

The banking board shall have the authority to examine the records and affairs of any bank holding company filing an application to acquire control of a Colorado bank or Colorado bank holding company pursuant to this article. The banking board shall have the power to subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance, require the production of evidence, administer an oath, and examine any person under oath in connection with any subject relating to a duty imposed upon, or power vested in, the banking board pursuant to this section. In case of a refusal of any person to comply with a lawful subpoena or order of the banking board issued pursuant to this section, upon proper petition by the banking board to the district court, the court shall require compliance therewith, and further refusal shall be punishable as contempt of court.

The banking board may, after notice and hearing pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., order any person to cease and desist from violating any provision of this article.

The banking board may, after notice and hearing pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., order any bank holding company controlling any other bank holding company or any bank in this state in violation of the provisions of this article to divest its interest in any such bank holding company or bank.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1111, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(1) amended, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1482, § 47, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-6.4-104 as it existed prior to 2003.